apertium-hun.hun.dix
    <!-- néz -->
    <pardef n="néz__vblex">
        <e><p><l>ni</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>el</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tek</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- jön jöv -->
    <pardef n="jö/n__vblex">

        <e><p><l>nni</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>vök</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ssz</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>n</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>vünk</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ttök</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sztök</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nnek</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        
    </pardef>


    <!-- megy -->
    <pardef n="me/gy__vblex">
      <e><p><l>nni</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>het</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nt</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gyek</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gy</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gyünk</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ntek</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nnek</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ntem</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ntél</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nt</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ntünk</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ntetek</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ntek</l><r>gy<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- van -->
    <pardef n="/van__vbser">
      <e><p><l>lenni</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lehet</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lehet-e</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pot"/>+e<s n="qst"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>volt</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vagyok</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vagy</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>van</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vagyunk</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vagytok</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vannak</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltam</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltál</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>volt</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltunk</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltatok</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltak</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Interjections -->

    <pardef n="nem__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="megvan"><i>meg</i><par n="/van__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="van"><i></i><par n="/van__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="befejéz"><i>befejéz</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="benéz"><i>benéz</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beszél"><i>beszél</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beszélget"><i>beszélget</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fejéz"><i>fejéz</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hisz"><i>hisz</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jön"><i>jö</i><par n="jö/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kinéz"><i>kinéz</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="keres"><i>keres</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kérdez"><i>kérdez</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="körülnéz"><i>körülnéz</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nevet"><i>nevet</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="megkérdez"><i>megkérdez</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="megy"><i>me</i><par n="me/gy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="néz"><i>néz</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ül"><i>ül</i><par n="néz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nem"><i>nem</i><par n="nem__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="igen"><i>igen</i><par n="nem__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nincs"><i>nincs</i><par n="nem__ij"/></e>
